Rhode Island statutes. Title 33 Probate Practice and Procedure
Chapter 18 Decedents’ and Incompetents’ Estates Generally

33-18-1.
Publication of qualification of fiduciary — Statement filed by clerk.

Upon the qualification of every executor, administrator, conservator, or guardian, the probate clerk shall give notice of the qualification by publication in any newspaper and as often as the court may direct, and in the newspaper shall notify creditors to file their claims in the office of the probate clerk within the time required by law. The clerk shall file in the court a written statement setting out a copy of the notice, the dates, and place of its publication, and generally his or her compliance with the order of the court. A certified copy of the statement shall be admitted as evidence of the time, place, and manner in which notice was given.

History of Section.

C.P.A. 1905, § 845; G.L. 1909, ch. 312, § 31; P.L. 1921, ch. 2075, § 1; P.L. 1922, ch. 2196, § 1; G.L. 1923, ch. 363, § 31; G.L. 1938, ch. 575, § 29; P.L. 1941, ch. 1003, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

33-18-1

.

33-18-2.
General grounds for removal of fiduciary.

Whenever an executor, administrator, or guardian shall for any cause become incapable of executing his or her trust, or shall neglect or refuse to do the duties of the trust, or shall waste the estate of his or her ward or that on which he or she administers, the probate court, upon petition, and after hearing, may remove the executor, administrator or guardian from office and appoint an administrator or guardian in place of the person so removed, and take such other action as occasion may require.

History of Section.

C.P.A. 1905, § 827; G.L. 1909, ch. 312, § 13; G.L. 1923, ch. 363, § 13; G.L. 1938, ch. 575, § 11; G.L. 1956, §

33-18-2

.

Parties to Proceedings.

An assignee of a devisee’s interest may bring an action for removal of the executor even though not within the literal terms of the section. Yeaw v. Searle,

2 R.I. 164

,

1852 R.I. LEXIS 23

(1852).

An assignee of a devisee’s interest who, during the pendency of an appeal from a decree refusing to remove an executor, assigned his interest in trust for the benefit of creditors cannot maintain the appeal since he no longer has a legal interest in the estate. Yeaw v. Searle,

2 R.I. 164

,

1852 R.I. LEXIS 23

(1852).

33-18-3.
Citation in action to remove fiduciary.

Whenever complaint shall be made by any person interested in the estate, or by any creditor, or by the surety on the bond of any executor, administrator or guardian, for the removal of an executor, administrator or guardian, a citation shall issue to the executor, administrator or guardian, embodying the substance of the complaint, or with a copy of the complaint annexed, which citation shall be in the form, and shall be served, as provided in §

33-22-12

.

History of Section.

C.P.A. 1905, § 773; G.L. 1909, ch. 309, § 10; G.L. 1923, ch. 360, § 10; G.L. 1938, ch. 571, § 12; G.L. 1956, §

33-18-3

.

33-18-4.
Resignation of fiduciary.

Whenever an executor, administrator, or guardian shall in writing resign his or her trust to the probate court having jurisdiction of the estate, the court may accept the resignation and, upon petition, appoint a successor, who shall have all the power that the person resigning had unless provision to the contrary is made by will; but no resignation shall be accepted until the person resigning shall have settled his or her accounts with the court.

History of Section.

C.P.A. 1905, § 828; G.L. 1909, ch. 312, § 14; G.L. 1923, ch. 363, § 14; G.L. 1938, ch. 575, § 12; G.L. 1956, §

33-18-4

.

33-18-5.
Appointment of new fiduciary — Powers of survivors — New bond.

In case the person so resigning was the sole executor, administrator, or guardian, the court shall appoint an administrator or guardian as a successor; if he or she were a joint executor or joint testamentary guardian, the continuing executor or guardian, if required, shall give a new bond; but if he or she were a joint administrator or guardian appointed by the court, a new administrator or guardian, if deemed advisable, may be appointed in the place of the one so resigning; and a new bond of the survivor, or of the survivor with the new administrator or guardian, shall be given, and other proceedings shall be taken as may be deemed advisable.

History of Section.

C.P.A. 1905, § 829; G.L. 1909, ch. 312, § 15; G.L. 1923, ch. 363, § 15; G.L. 1938, ch. 575, § 13; G.L. 1956, §

33-18-5

.

33-18-6.
Transfer of records and property to successor fiduciary — Action on bond.

An administrator or guardian appointed to succeed an executor, administrator, or guardian shall demand and receive of the preceding executor, administrator, or guardian, his or her heirs, executors, or administrators, all the goods and effects, books of account, securities, documents, or papers whatsoever belonging to the estate held by him or her or them, and in case of neglect or refusal to deliver them the probate court may, upon the petition of the successor or of any person beneficially interested, after hearing thereon, order the person holding them to deliver the property so held by him or her, and shall have the power to enforce the order by summary process for contempt, and the successor may also bring an action for the recovery of property, and the successor shall also bring an action on the bond of the preceding executor, administrator or guardian against all parties liable on the bond, which action when brought shall bar all actions by others on the bond for the same breach; but if the successor neglects or refuses to bring an action on the bond after written request therefor by any person interested, it shall be deemed a breach of his or her bond, and in this case suit may be brought on the first named bond by any person interested.

History of Section.

C.P.A. 1905, § 830; G.L. 1909, ch. 312, § 16; G.L. 1923, ch. 363, § 16; G.L. 1938, ch. 575, § 14; G.L. 1956, §

33-18-6

.

33-18-7.
Continuation of actions by or against successor fiduciary.

Whenever an executor, administrator, or guardian, by or against whom any action concerning the estate of the testator, intestate or ward is prosecuted shall die, resign, or be removed, the action shall not thereby be abated, but the successor, if any, may come into court to prosecute or defend, or may be summoned in, in such manner as the court may direct.

History of Section.

C.P.A. 1905, § 831; G.L. 1909, ch. 312, § 17; G.L. 1923, ch. 363, § 17; G.L. 1938, ch. 575, § 15; G.L. 1956, §

33-18-7

.

33-18-8.
Judgment against fiduciary in continuation of action by or against decedent.

If an executor, administrator, or guardian shall neglect to appear and take upon himself or herself the prosecution or defense of an action, suit, or proceeding as provided in §

33-9-24

, being duly notified thereof by order of the court where the same shall be pending, or if, having appeared and become a party thereto, judgment shall pass against the executor, administrator, or guardian, the court, subject to the provisions of §

33-11-44

, may enter judgment against the estate in the hands of the executor, administrator, or guardian, and the like process shall be had thereon as if the action, suit, or proceeding had been originally commenced against him or her in his or her original capacity.

History of Section.

C.P.A. 1905, § 971; G.L. 1909, ch. 318, § 6; G.L. 1923, ch. 369, § 6; G.L. 1938, ch. 579, § 6; G.L. 1956, §

33-18-8

.

33-18-9.
Appointment of agent by nonresident fiduciary.

Every executor, administrator or guardian appointed in, but residing out of, the state shall, before entering upon the duties of his or her trust, appoint in writing an agent residing in this state, and shall by the writing agree that the service of any legal process against him or her as executor, administrator, or guardian, if made on, or acknowledged by, the agent, shall be of the same legal effect as if made on himself or herself personally within this state. The writing shall have the address of the agent, and shall be filed in the office of the clerk of the probate court by which the appointment was made, and the notice of appointment of the executor, administrator, or guardian shall state the name and address of his or her agent.

History of Section.

C.P.A. 1905, § 858; G.L. 1909, ch. 312, § 44; G.L. 1923, ch. 363, § 44; G.L. 1938, ch. 575, § 42; G.L. 1956, §

33-18-9

.

33-18-10.
Appointment of agent by fiduciary removing from state.

Every executor, administrator, or guardian appointed in this state but who thereafter leaves the state shall in writing appoint a like agent with like stipulations, and shall cause the writing to be filed in the office of the clerk of the probate court which appointed him or her.

History of Section.

C.P.A. 1905, § 859; G.L. 1909, ch. 312, § 45; G.L. 1923, ch. 363, § 45; G.L. 1938, ch. 575, § 43; G.L. 1956, §

33-18-10

.

33-18-11.
Death, resignation, or removal of fiduciary’s agent from state.

If an agent appointed under the provisions of §§

33-18-9

and

33-18-10

dies, resigns, or leaves the state before the final settlement of the estate, another like appointment shall be made and filed as above provided.

History of Section.

C.P.A. 1905, § 860; G.L. 1909, ch. 312, § 46; G.L. 1923, ch. 363, § 46; G.L. 1938, ch. 575, § 44; G.L. 1956, §

33-18-11

.

33-18-12.
Revocation of power of fiduciary’s agent.

The power of an agent appointed under either of §§

33-18-9

—

33-18-11

shall not be revoked until the final settlement of the estate, unless another agent is appointed in his or her place and the appointment filed as above provided.

History of Section.

C.P.A. 1905, § 861; G.L. 1909, ch. 312, § 47; G.L. 1923, ch. 363, § 47; G.L. 1938, ch. 575, § 45; G.L. 1956, §

33-18-12

.

33-18-13.
Removal of fiduciary for failure to appoint agent.

Neglect or refusal on the part of an executor, administrator, or guardian to comply with any requirement of §§

33-18-9

—

33-18-12

may be cause for removal.

History of Section.

C.P.A. 1905, § 863; G.L. 1909, ch. 312, § 48; G.L. 1923, ch. 363, § 48; G.L. 1938, ch. 575, § 46; G.L. 1956, §

33-18-13

.

33-18-14.
Service of process on fiduciary’s agent.

Service of any legal process upon an agent appointed under §§

33-18-9

—

33-18-12

shall be of the same legal effect as if made upon his or her principal in this state.

History of Section.

C.P.A. 1905, § 863; G.L. 1909, ch. 312, § 49; G.L. 1923, ch. 363, § 49; G.L. 1938, ch. 575, § 47; G.L. 1956, §

33-18-14

.

33-18-15.
Exercise of power of sale in mortgage.

In case of a mortgage containing powers of sale, the executor, administrator, or guardian of the estate for the time being of the mortgagee may, on default, unless provisions to the contrary be made in the mortgage, exercise the enumerated powers of sale. The executor, administrator, or guardian may, if empowered by the mortgage or by law, and if in his or her discretion it is necessary to prevent a sacrifice of the property, bid upon and buy in the mortgaged property at the sale; and having so purchased, may, on application to the probate court, be authorized to resell the property at public or private sale pursuant to the direction of the court, and convey, without being accountable for any resulting loss. The proceeds of the sale shall be personal property.

History of Section.

C.P.A. 1905, § 880; G.L. 1909, ch. 313, § 15; G.L. 1923, ch. 364, § 15; G.L. 1938, ch. 577, § 15; G.L. 1956, §

33-18-15

.

33-18-16.
Abandonment or adjustment of controversies.

The probate court may authorize executors, administrators, guardians, and conservators to submit to arbitration, to abandon, or to adjust by compromise, or otherwise settle or dispose of, any claim in favor of or against, or any controversy or thing whatever relating to the estates by them represented, whether or not arising under, or involving the construction of, the provisions of a will, trust deed or other instrument, and for any of these purposes to enter into, give, execute, make, and do such agreements, instruments, deeds, conveyances, assignments, settlements, payments, compositions, arrangements, court or other stipulations, releases, receipts, and other things as the probate court shall by its order or decree approve or authorize.

History of Section.

C.P.A. 1905, § 838; G.L. 1909, ch. 312, § 24; G.L. 1923, ch. 363, § 24; G.L. 1938, ch. 575, § 22; P.L. 1951, ch. 2706, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

33-18-16

.

33-18-17.
Action in name of estate prosecuted by interested person.

If an administrator, executor, or guardian shall be requested by any person legally interested in the estate of a deceased person, or person under guardianship, to commence an action or proceeding to recover any property, personal or real, which the legally interested person may have reason to believe should be recovered for the benefit of the estate, and if the administrator, executor, or guardian shall, for fifteen (15) days after written notice so to do, either personally delivered to himself or herself or his or her agent, or left at the last and usual place of abode of himself or herself or his or her agent, refuse, neglect or for any reason be incompetent, to commence the action or proceeding, the legally interested person may institute proceedings in the name of the estate of the deceased person, or person under guardianship, in the same manner and to the same extent as the administrator, executor, or guardian may do in the case of personal property, and in the case of real estate in the same manner as a guardian, devisee, or heir at law may do, to recover the property.

History of Section.

G.L., ch. 312, § 52, as enacted by P.L. 1911, ch. 707, § 1; G.L. 1923, ch. 363, § 52; G.L. 1938, ch. 575, § 50; G.L. 1956, §

33-18-17

.

33-18-18.
Intervention in proceedings by or against estate.

If a suit or proceeding be pending, whether instituted by the administrator, executor, guardian, or any legally interested person, then no additional suit or proceeding shall be brought for the same cause, but the administrator, executor, guardian, or any legally interested person, may intervene in the prosecution of the suit or proceeding, upon motion, in the discretion of the court having jurisdiction of the action; and if a suit or proceeding be pending against an administrator, executor or guardian, any legally interested person may, with like consent, intervene in the defense to the suit or proceeding.

History of Section.

G.L., ch. 312, § 53, as enacted by P.L. 1911, ch. 707, § 1; G.L. 1923, ch. 363, § 53; G.L. 1938, ch. 575, § 51; G.L. 1956, §

33-18-18

.

33-18-19.
Costs and expenses in proceeding prosecuted or intervened in by interested person.

Any legally interested person instituting a suit or proceeding shall, in case of failure to prosecute the suit successfully, be entitled to no costs, and shall be personally liable to the adverse party for costs, and in no event shall those legally interested persons instituting a suit or proceeding or intervening to prosecute or defend a pending action be entitled to more than the reasonable expenses incurred by him or her in the proceedings or defense, to be allowed out of the estate of the deceased person or person under guardianship, by the court having probate jurisdiction of the estate, to be paid by the administrator, executor, or guardian; and shall not be entitled to any reimbursement for the expenses, unless the proceedings or defense, by intervention or otherwise, shall be found by the court of probate to have been necessary for the protection of the estate. In any case where additional parties intervene in the prosecution or defense of an existing suit or proceeding, the allowance made for all expenses shall not exceed such reasonable amount as the court of probate finds should have been incurred for the proper prosecution or defense of the action or proceeding.

History of Section.

G.L., ch. 312, § 54, as enacted by P.L. 1911, ch. 707, § 1; G.L. 1923, ch. 363, § 54; G.L. 1938, ch. 575, § 52; G.L. 1956, §

33-18-19

.

33-18-20.
Compromise of actions prosecuted or defended by interested persons — Property recovered.

Courts of probate shall have the power to compromise all claims sued for or defended by any legally interested person referred to in §§

33-18-17

—

33-18-19

in the same manner and to the same extent as may now be done by the probate courts with reference to claims by or against estates of deceased persons or persons under guardianship. All property obtained by an interested person for the benefit of the estate through the proceeding shall be turned over by the adverse party to the administrator, executor, or guardian, if personal property, in the same manner as all other property coming to the possession of the administrator, executor, or guardian; and shall become the property of the ward in cases of guardianship, or of the heirs at law or devisees under a will, as either may become entitled to the property, in case of real estate; the administrator, executor, or guardian being first required to furnish an additional bond to the probate court for the proper administration of personal property so obtained.

History of Section.

G.L., ch. 312, § 55, as enacted by P.L. 1911, ch. 707, § 1; G.L. 1923, ch. 363, § 55; G.L. 1938, ch. 575, § 53; G.L. 1956, §

33-18-20

.

33-18-21.
Recording of documents in court.

Any paper or instrument discharging a claim or purporting to acknowledge the performance of a duty or the payment of money, for which an executor, administrator, or guardian is chargeable or accountable in a probate court, shall, upon the request of a party interested, be recorded in the records of the court, certified copies of which record may be used in evidence; and the probate clerk shall enter, record, index and certify any original paper or instrument offered as provided in this chapter.

History of Section.

C.P.A. 1905, § 846; G.L. 1909, ch. 312, § 32; G.L. 1923, ch. 363, § 32; G.L. 1938, ch. 575, § 30; G.L. 1956, §

33-18-21

.

33-18-22.
Release by good faith delivery of property under court order.

Whenever any person acting as executor, administrator, custodian, or guardian shall make payments or deliver property or estate pursuant to the order of a probate court having jurisdiction, after the expiration of the time within which an appeal lies from the order and while an appeal is not pending from the order, the person making the payment or delivery in good faith shall not be liable or in any way responsible for the money so paid or the property so delivered, although the order under or by virtue of which the payment or delivery shall be made shall afterwards be reversed, vacated, or set aside. This provision shall not prevent a recovery of the money or property, by the person entitled thereto, from any person receiving it or in possession of the money or property.

History of Section.

C.P.A. 1905, § 852; G.L. 1909, ch. 312, § 38; G.L. 1923, ch. 363, § 38; G.L. 1938, ch. 575, § 36; G.L. 1956, §

33-18-22

.

33-18-23.
Bona fide transfer of property to executor, administrator, or guardian.

All persons making or permitting to be made any payment or transfer bona fide upon any official certificate of appointment of any executor, administrator, or guardian, issued by the probate court in respect of the estate of any deceased person or ward, shall be justified and held harmless in so doing, notwithstanding any defect or circumstance whatsoever affecting the validity of the appointment; provided, that the transfer of personal property, stock, or rights of action is not made within forty (40) days from an order or decree granting letters testamentary, of administration, or of guardianship, nor while an appeal is pending from an order or decree.

History of Section.

C.P.A. 1905, § 853; G.L. 1909, ch. 312, § 39; G.L. 1923, ch. 363, § 39; G.L. 1938, ch. 575, § 37; G.L. 1956, §

33-18-23

.

33-18-24.
Transfer of corporate securities and mortgages by foreign fiduciary.

Any corporation organized under the laws of this state may, before having actual notice of the pendency of an application in this state for letters testamentary, of administration, or guardianship, permit the executor of the will or administrator of the estate of a decedent who at the time of his or her death was not a resident in this state, or a guardian whose ward does not reside in this state, duly appointed, qualified, and authorized under the laws of any other state, territory, or district of the United States, to transfer to any person shares of stock and registered bonds standing in the name of the decedent or ward and to receive the dividends and interest thereon. The executor of the will or administrator of the estate of a decedent who at the time of his or her death was not a resident in this state, or a guardian whose ward does not reside in this state, duly appointed and qualified under the laws of any other state, territory, or district of the United States shall have the power to and may assign and transfer any mortgage debt, note, and mortgage, held by or belonging to the decedent or to the ward, upon any real estate or personal property located in this state, provided a duly authenticated copy of the certificate of the appointment of the executor, administrator, or guardian, and evidence that the appointment has not been revoked, are annexed to the assignment and transfer.

History of Section.

C.P.A. 1905, § 853; G.L. 1909, ch. 312, § 27; G.L. 1923, ch. 363, § 27; G.L. 1938, ch. 575, § 25; P.L. 1943, ch. 1324, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

33-18-24

.

33-18-25.
Payment of debt or delivery of property to foreign fiduciary.

Any person or corporation in this state, before having actual notice of the pendency of an application in this state for letters testamentary of administration or guardianship may pay any money owing or deliver any personal property belonging to the estate of any decedent whose residence at the time of his or her death was not in this state, or belonging to any person under guardianship whose residence is not in this state, to the executor or administrator of the decedent or to the guardian of the ward duly appointed, qualified, and authorized to receive the same under the laws of any other state, territory or district of the United States; and the receipt for payment or delivery to the executor, administrator, or guardian shall be a valid discharge for that money and personal property.

History of Section.

C.P.A. 1905, § 842; G.L. 1909, ch. 312, § 28; G.L. 1923, ch. 363, § 28; G.L. 1938, ch. 575, § 26; G.L. 1956, §

33-18-25

.

33-18-26.
Action by foreign executor or administrator — Prerequisites.

If a corporation refuses to permit a transfer as provided in §

33-18-24

or a person indebted refuses to pay, or having possession refuses to deliver personal property as permitted in §

33-18-25

, the executor or administrator, if there is no executor or administrator appointed in this state, upon application to the probate court of any town in this state in which any real estate of the decedent is located, or, if there is no real estate in this state, in which any personal property of the decedent is situated, or in which any debtor resides, or in which any corporation the decedent owned shares of stock or registered bonds is located, may be authorized by the court to transfer the shares and bonds or to take possession of the personal property and collect the debts, and the executor or administrator may demand, sue for, and recover the property or debts; provided, that no foreign executor or administrator shall be authorized to make any transfer or take possession of personal property under the provisions of this section until he or she shall have filed in the court a copy of the will, if any, and of his or her appointment, authenticated as provided in this chapter, nor until six (6) months after his or her appointment, nor until he or she shall have given bond to the probate court appointing him or her, unless sufficient bond has been given, nor until he or she shall have advertised notice of his or her application in this state at least once each week for two (2) successive weeks in some newspaper, as directed by the probate court; and provided, further, that no authority to transfer or take possession shall be granted, if any creditor of the deceased person or ward shall show to the probate court valid objections to the transfer or possession, supported by a sworn statement of his or her claim or demand and that the same is justly due.

History of Section.

C.P.A. 1905, § 843; G.L. 1909, ch. 312, § 29; G.L. 1923, ch. 363, § 29; G.L. 1938, ch. 575, § 27; G.L. 1956, §

33-18-26

.

33-18-27.
Perpetuation by fiduciary of evidence of payments and delivery — Final discharge.

If an executor, administrator, or guardian has paid or delivered to the persons entitled thereto the money or other property in his or her hands as required by a decree of a probate court, he or she may perpetuate the evidence of payment or delivery by presenting to the court, within one year after the decree is made, an account of the payments or delivery, together with the vouchers therefor, which shall be kept in the files of the court. The account, being proved to the satisfaction of the court, and verified by the oath of the executor, administrator, or guardian, shall be allowed as his or her final discharge and ordered to be recorded. This discharge shall forever exonerate the executor, administrator, or guardian, and his or her sureties, from all liability under the decree unless his or her account is impeached for fraud or manifest errors.

History of Section.

C.P.A. 1905, § 1006; G.L. 1909, ch. 319, § 12; G.L. 1923, ch. 370, § 12; G.L. 1938, ch. 580, § 10; G.L. 1956, §

33-18-27

.

33-18-28.
Decree ratifying payment or delivery by fiduciary without order.

If, without an order of court, an executor, administrator, or guardian pays or delivers any money or other property in his or her hands to a legatee, distributee, or ward, and thereafter renders an account, upon oath, with a full and detailed statement, to the probate court, and after notice it appears that the person to whom the money has been paid or property delivered would have been entitled to an order of court for the payment or delivery, and that the account ought to be allowed, the probate court may make a decree, which shall have the same effect to exonerate and discharge the executor, administrator, or guardian, and his or her sureties, from further liability as if the payment or delivery had been made under a previous order of the probate court.

History of Section.

C.P.A. 1905, § 1007; G.L. 1909, ch. 319, § 13; G.L. 1923, ch. 370, § 13; G.L. 1938, ch. 580, § 11; G.L. 1956, §

33-18-28

.

33-18-29.
Deposit of unclaimed funds in court — Payment by court.

If money, which a decree of a probate court has ordered to be paid over, remains for six (6) months unclaimed, the executor, administrator, or guardian who was ordered to pay over the money may deposit it in the registry of the probate court to accumulate for the benefit of the person entitled to the money. The person making the deposit shall take the receipt of the probate court for the money, and then shall be discharged from all liability as to the money. When the person entitled to the money deposited satisfies the probate court of his or her right to receive the same, the court shall cause it to be paid over and transferred to him or her, with all accumulations of money.

History of Section.

C.P.A. 1905, § 1009; G.L. 1909, ch. 319, § 15; G.L. 1923, ch. 370, § 15; G.L. 1938, ch. 579, § 31; G.L. 1956, §

33-18-29

.

33-18-30.
Delivery of funds, securities, or instruments into court for which fiduciary cannot give proper discharge.

If an executor, administrator, or guardian holds any money, stock certificates, bond, or other chose in action payable or deliverable to a legatee, next of kin, ward, or other person, and the person entitled thereto cannot give a proper discharge therefor, or is out of the country, or his or her whereabouts are unknown after proper inquiry, and the executor, administrator, or guardian desires to free himself or herself from further liability therefor, he or she may pay or deliver the property into the registry of the probate court which appointed him or her, and present therewith his or her petition praying to be discharged, and setting out under oath the title of the person and why he or she cannot give proper discharge therefor.

History of Section.

C.P.A. 1905, § 1010; G.L. 1909, ch. 319, § 16; G.L. 1923, ch. 370, § 16; G.L. 1938, ch. 579, § 32; G.L. 1956, §

33-18-30

.

33-18-31.
Hearing and decree on funds, securities, or instruments for which fiduciary cannot give proper discharge — Costs and expenses — Payment or delivery by court.

Upon the filing of a petition, such notice of the time and place of hearing thereon shall be given as the court shall direct; and after a hearing on the petition, the court may enter a decree granting a discharge, if it deems it proper, and thereafter the executor, administrator or guardian shall be relieved from all liability for the money, stock certificate, bond or other chose in action, and interest thereon. All costs and expenses on the petition, including expenses and counsel fees of the executor, administrator or guardian, as allowed by the court, shall be paid or retained out of the money or be a lien on any stock or chose in action and any dividend or interest payable thereon. When any person entitled to money, stock or chose in action shall appear and satisfy the court as to his or her right thereto, the same with the accumulations thereof, after deducting the expenses and counsel fees, shall be paid or delivered to him or her as the court shall direct.

History of Section.

C.P.A. 1905, § 1011; G.L. 1909, ch. 319, § 17; G.L. 1923, ch. 370, § 17; G.L. 1938, ch. 579, § 33; G.L. 1956, §

33-18-31

.